Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Chapter 2 Contractors or Materialmen

In interpretation of lien laws, supreme court has considered decisions of Missouri,

the jurisdiction of the law or origin, to be persuasive. Arch Sellery, Inc. v. Simpson, 346 P.2d 1068,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1959); True v. Hi-Plains Elevator Mach., 577 P.2d 991,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1978).

Mechanics' liens laws are intended to create means of securing claims

of a particular class of creditors and to prevent unjust enrichment arising out of the enhancement of value of property from labor and materials which would otherwise go without payment. Engle v. First Nat'l Bank, 590 P.2d 826,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1979).

Applied

in

Elder v. Jones, 608 P.2d 654,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d Mechanics' Liens § 1 et seq.

Priority as between lien for repairs and right of seller under conditional contract, 36 ALR2d 198.

Statutes as to actions by person doing business under an assumed or fictitious name or designation not showing names of persons interested as applicable to filing of lien for repairs, 42 ALR2d 516.

Amount for which mechanic's lien may be obtained where contract has been terminated or abandoned by consent of parties or without fault on contractor's part, 51 ALR2d 1009.

Validity of statute making private property owner liable to contractor's laborers, materialmen or subcontractors where owner fails to exact bond or employ other means of securing their payment, 59 ALR2d 885.

Taking or negotiation of unsecured note of owner or contractor as waiver of lien, 91 ALR2d 425.

Mechanic's lien based on contract with vendor pending executory contract for sale of property as affecting purchaser's interest, 50 ALR3d 944.

Amount of compensation for attorney's services in absence of contract or statute fixing amount, 57 ALR3d 475, 58 ALR3d 201, 59 ALR3d 152.

Effect of bankruptcy of principal contractor upon mechanic's lien of a subcontractor, laborer or materialman as against owner of property, 69 ALR3d 1342.

Demand for or submission to arbitration as affecting enforcement of mechanic's lien, 73 ALR3d 1042.

Filing of mechanic's lien or proceeding for its enforcement as affecting right to arbitration, 73 ALR3d 1066.

Who is the “owner” within the mechanic's lien statute requiring notice of claim, 76 ALR3d 605.

Right of vendee under executory land contract to lien for amount paid on purchase price as against subsequent creditors of purchasers from vendor, 82 ALR3d 1040.

Right of subcontractor's subcontractor or materialman, or of materialman's materialman, to mechanic's lien, 24 ALR4th 963.

Landlord's liability to third party for repairs authorized by tenant, 46 ALR5th 1.

§ 29-2-101.
Persons entitled to liens; extent of lien on realty; exceptions.

Every contractor, subcontractor or materialman performing any work on or furnishing any materials for any building or any improvement upon real property shall have for his work done or plans or materials furnished a lien upon the building or improvements, and upon the real property of the owner on which they are situated to the extent of one (1) acre. If the improvements cover more than one (1) acre the lien shall extend to all the additional real property covered thereby.

To have a lien the work or materials shall be furnished under a contract.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section if the real property subject to a lien is located in any city, town or subdivision the lien shall extend to the entire lot upon which the building or improvement is located.

A cooperative utility, as defined by W.S. 17-20-140(a)(i), shall have a lien for the materials or services provided to a member. The lien shall attach to the real property of the member at the location where the materials or services were provided, if the amount due to the utility:

Is greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00); and

Has been unpaid for more than ninety (90) days.

The lien under this section shall extend to the owner’s real property and easements to the extent necessary to provide legal access by a roadway for ingress and egress to the building, improvements or real property subject to the lien, not to exceed forty (40) feet in width to the nearest easement, public road or highway.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 77, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1517; R.S. 1899, § 2889; C.S. 1910, § 3799; C.S. 1920, § 4859; R.S. 1931, § 66-501; C.S. 1945, § 55-201; W.S. 1957, § 29-4; W.S. 1977, §

29-2-102

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 1989, ch. 82, § 2; 2007, ch. 193, § 1; 2010, ch. 92, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added subsection (d).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), deleted “Except as provided in W.S. 29-2-111” at the beginning, substituted “contractor, subcontractor or materialman” for “person,” deleted “or plans” following “furnishing any materials” and substituted “real property” for “land” throughout; substituted “real property” for “land” in (c); and added (e).

Constitutionality. —

Statute giving a subcontractor lien for labor and materials actually entering into the structure, as against an owner with whom he had no direct contractual relation, is constitutional. Becker v. Hopper, 22 Wyo. 237, 138 P. 179,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1914).

Lien valid. —

Former statute that required prompt lien notice applies to projects under construction prior to the effective date of the statute requiring 5 days' notice; therefore, a lien was improperly invalidated because prompt notice was given where a week passed that included a weekend and a legal holiday. An argument that a printed version did not contain a session law relating to the effectiveness of the new statute was rejected because enrolled bills governed over incorrect or incomplete printed versions. Elec. Wholesale Supply Co. v. Fraser, 2015 WY 105, 356 P.3d 254,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2015).

Full statutory compliances required for lien. —

Mechanics' liens were not recognized at and are in derogation of common law so there must be full compliance with legislative requirements, as statutory lien laws must be strictly construed and their scope cannot be extended. American Bldgs. Co. v. Wheelers Stores, 585 P.2d 845,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1978).

“Contractor.” —

When a contract concerns the construction of improvements to real property, “contractor” has a specialized meaning related to the building trades; and it is in this sense that “contractor” is connected to the law of mechanics' liens. American Bldgs. Co. v. Wheelers Stores, 585 P.2d 845,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1978).

“Subcontractor.” —

In building contracts, a “subcontractor” is one who assumes performance of a portion or all of the contract work which the contractor has obligated himself to perform under contract with the owner. American Bldgs. Co. v. Wheelers Stores, 585 P.2d 845,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1978).

“Materialman.” —

One who merely furnishes materials to the owner or a contractor is a materialman, and not a contractor or subcontractor, within the meaning of the mechanics' lien laws. American Bldgs. Co. v. Wheelers Stores, 585 P.2d 845,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1978).

One who not only furnishes materials, but installs them, is a contractor or a subcontractor, and not a materialman, within the meaning of mechanics' lien laws. American Bldgs. Co. v. Wheelers Stores, 585 P.2d 845,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1978).

Delivery of materials sustains lien. —

Provided the other requirements of this section are met, a delivery of materials to the building site is sufficient to sustain a mechanic's lien, even though the material, without the materialman's fault or consent, is never used or is diverted to some other use. Schaefer v. Lampert Lumber Co., 591 P.2d 1225,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 382

(Wyo. 1979).

Forfeiture under this section is not favored

unless there is some specific provision made for it. Engle v. First Nat'l Bank, 590 P.2d 826,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1979).

Inclusion in description of more land than lien may attach does not vitiate lien

upon so much of the land as the lien may attach. Engle v. First Nat'l Bank, 590 P.2d 826,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1979).

Contract authorizing filing of lien may be either express or implied. —

In order to authorize the filing of a lien under this section the existence of a contract is necessary, but it may be either express or implied. Arch Sellery, Inc. v. Simpson, 346 P.2d 1068,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1959).

An implied contract is amply sufficient upon which to base a mechanic's lien. Jordan v. Natrona Lumber Co., 52 Wyo. 393, 75 P.2d 378,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1938).

This section does not call for a written contract or express contract or formal contract; an implied contract is sufficient upon which to base a mechanic's lien. Engle v. First Nat'l Bank, 590 P.2d 826,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1979).

Although a contractor approved a subcontractor's invoices in excess of the target price without increasing the amount in writing as specified in the contract, the labor and materials were furnished under a contract and did not exceed the contract price because the claimed lien amount had been approved under the contract by the conduct of the parties.
KM Upstream, LLC v. Elkhorn Constr., Inc., 2012 WY 79, 278 P.3d 711,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2012).

Performance may give rise to contract. —

Under this section, acceptance of or acquiescence in a performance will give rise to a valid contract. Schaefer v. Lampert Lumber Co., 591 P.2d 1225,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 382

(Wyo. 1979).

Conduct showing ratification of contract. —

Where husband and wife decided to build a home on a lot jointly owned by them, wife selected plans and specifications, went with husband to architect to have the plans drawn, joined in mortgage to obtain money for construction, and was often upon premises as work progressed, her conduct showed that she either authorized or ratified husband's act in contracting for construction of the house. Phelan v. Cheyenne Brick Co., 26 Wyo. 493, 188 P. 354,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 26 Wyo. 493, 189 P. 1103,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1920).

Where wife not made party. —

Subcontractor was not entitled to foreclose mechanic's lien against property held by husband and wife by entirety by virtue of deed recorded 2 months after filing of lien statement in which wife was not named where wife was not made party to suit to foreclose until 3 years after filing lien statement. Peters v. Dona, 49 Wyo. 306, 54 P.2d 817,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1936).

Owner of equitable title cannot burden legal title with liens.

Sargent v. Delgado, 492 P.2d 193,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1972).

Thus contract made by vendee for labor and materials will not subject legal owner's interest to a lien,

even if the latter has knowledge that the labor and materials are being furnished. Sargent v. Delgado, 492 P.2d 193,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1972).

Materialman supplying materialman not afforded lien. —

A materialman supplying a materialman is too remote a relationship to be within the sphere of statutory protection affording a lien to suppliers of materials. American Bldgs. Co. v. Wheelers Stores, 585 P.2d 845,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1978).

Superintendent's lien for services. —

Superintendent and engineer in charge of construction of plant who also performed work was entitled to lien for his salary. Continental & Commercial Trust & Sav. Bank v. North Platte Valley Irr. Co., 219 F. 438, 1915 U.S. App. LEXIS 1639 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1915).

Lien on leased premises. —

Under lease by which lessor obligates lessee as part consideration to make permanent and substantial improvements on a building, and lessee fails to pay materialman for materials furnished, latter has right to claim a lien upon the lease premises, lessee being presumed to be lessor's agent. Jordan v. Natrona Lumber Co., 52 Wyo. 393, 75 P.2d 378,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1938).

Subcontractor's lien

does not depend on condition of accounts between owner and contractor and is not defeated because nothing is due from owner to contractor. Becker v. Hopper, 23 Wyo. 209, 147 P. 1085,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1914).

Sufficiency of lien statement. —

Under this section, giving mechanic's lien upon compliance with provisions of this chapter, and §

29-2-109

, prescribing lien statement to be filed, a lien statement, “Becker Hotel contract, tin work, etc., $1,292,” was insufficient. Becker v. Hopper, 22 Wyo. 237, 138 P. 179,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1914).

Although a subcontractor's lien statement did not specifically reference this section, it adequately set forth both a mechanic's lien claim and an oil and gas lien claim.
KM Upstream, LLC v. Elkhorn Constr., Inc., 2012 WY 79, 278 P.3d 711,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2012).

No lien on school building. —

The statute giving liens for materials used in constructing buildings does not give lien on a county high school building for brick furnished and used in the construction thereof. Peters v. Killibrew, 24 Wyo. 53, 154 P. 996,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1916).

Dwelling house erected upon land held in trust by United States for benefit of its Indian ward,

under contract with the Indian, is not subject to the state law of Wyoming providing for mechanics' liens, and such dwelling house may not be sold to satisfy such liens. United States v. Chinburg, 224 F.2d 177, 1955 U.S. App. LEXIS 4059 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 350 U.S. 897, 76 S. Ct. 156, 100 L. Ed. 788, 1955 U.S. LEXIS 163 (U.S. 1955).

Lien allowable on where building located. —

Where building was located on lots 5 and 6, but court permitted foreclosure against lots 5, 6 and 7, decree should be modified by excluding lot 7, since lien is allowable only on lots on which building is located. Mawson-Peterson Lumber Co. v. Sprinkle, 59 Wyo. 334, 140 P.2d 588,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1943).

Applied

in

Lasich v. Wimpenney, 73 Wyo. 345, 278 P.2d 807,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1955).

Quoted

in

Minnehoma Fin. Co. v. Pauli, 565 P.2d 835,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1977); Weyerhaeuser Co. v. Walters, 707 P.2d 733,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 585

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Davis v. Big Horn Lumber Co., 14 Wyo. 517, 85 P. 980,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1906); United Pac. Ins. Co. v. Martin & Luther Gen. Contractors, 455 P.2d 664,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1969); True v. Hi-Plains Elevator Mach., Inc., 577 P.2d 991,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1978); Tottenhoff v. Rocky Mt. Constr. Co., 609 P.2d 464,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1980); Keith L. Dobson & Aspen Constr. Co. v. Portrait Homes, Inc., 2005 WY 95, 117 P.3d 1200,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(2005).

Law reviews. —

See note, “Wilful Abandonment and Enforcement of a Mechanic's Lien,” 5 Wyo. L.J. 205.

For case note, “Who is a Contractor under Mechanics' Lien Law. American Bldgs. Co. v. Wheelers Stores, 585 P.2d 845,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1978),” see 14 Land & Water L. Rev. 635 (1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to mechanic's lien for “labor” or “work,” in case of preparatory or fabricating work done on materials intended for use and used in particular building or structure, 25 ALR2d 1370.

Delivery of material to building site as sustaining mechanic's lien, 39 ALR2d 394.

Mechanic's lien for landscaping, 39 ALR2d 866.

Grading, clearing, filling, excavating and the like, 39 ALR2d 866.

Right to mechanic's lien upon leasehold for supplying labor or material in attaching or installing fixtures, 42 ALR2d 685.

Amount for which mechanic's lien may be obtained where contract has been terminated or abandoned by consent of parties or without fault on contractor's part, 51 ALR2d 1009.

Lien for improvements made or placed on premises of another by mistake, 57 ALR2d 263.

Validity of statute making private property owner liable to contractor's laborers, materialmen or subcontractors, where owner fails to exact bond or employ other means of securing their payment, 59 ALR2d 885.

Estate by entireties, interest in, as subject to mechanic's lien in satisfaction of his or her individual debt, 75 ALR2d 1172.

Contract against mechanic's lien, validity and effect, 76 ALR2d 1087.

Mortgages, priority, 80 ALR2d 179.

Subdividing land, services in connection with, 87 ALR2d 1004.

Water well-drilling contract, work under, 90 ALR2d 1346.

Rights and liabilities with respect to natural gas reduced to possession and subsequently stored in natural reservoir, 94 ALR2d 543.

Swimming pool as lienable item within mechanic's lien statute, 95 ALR2d 1371.

What constitutes commencement of building or improvement for purposes of determining accrual of lien, 1 ALR3d 822.

Charge for use of machinery, tools or appliances used in construction as basis for mechanic's lien, 3 ALR3d 573.

Single mechanic's lien under entire contract, against 2 or more separate buildings on different lots in same ownership, 15 ALR3d 73.

Surveyor's work as giving rise to right to mechanic's lien, 35 ALR3d 1391.

Mechanic's lien for labor or material furnished under contract with vendor pending executory contract for sale of property as affecting purchaser's interest, 50 ALR3d 944.

Municipal property as subject to mechanic's lien, 51 ALR3d 657.

Labor in examination, repair or servicing of fixtures, machinery or attachments in building, as supporting a mechanic's lien, or as extending time for filing such a lien, 51 ALR3d 1087.

Assertion of statutory mechanic's or materialman's lien against oil and gas produced or against proceeds attributable to oil and gas sold, 59 ALR3d 278.

Removal or demolition of building or other structure as basis for mechanic's lien, 74 ALR3d 386.

Release or waiver of mechanic's lien by general contractor as affecting rights of subcontractor or materialman, 75 ALR3d 505.

Vacation and sick pay and other fringe benefits as within mechanic's lien statute, 20 ALR4th 1268.

Right of subcontractor's subcontractor or materialman, or of materialman's materialman, to mechanic's lien, 24 ALR4th 963.

Delivery of material to building site as sustaining mechanic's lien — modern cases, 32 ALR4th 1130.

Architect's services as within mechanics' lien statute, 31 ALR5th 664.

Timeliness of notice to public works contractor on federal project, of indebtedness for labor or materials furnished, 69 ALR Fed 600.

§ 29-2-102.
Extent of perfected lien.

Any lien properly perfected shall extend to the entire interest of the owner.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 77, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1518; R.S. 1899, § 2890; C.S. 1910, § 3800; C.S. 1920, § 4863; R.S. 1931, § 66-505; C.S. 1945, § 55-202; W.S. 1957, § 29-5; W.S. 1977, §

29-2-103

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

Leased premises. —

Under lease by which lessor obligates lessee as part consideration to make permanent and substantial improvements on a building and lessee fails to pay materialman for materials furnished, latter has right to claim a lien upon the leased premises, lessee being presumed to be lessor's agent. Jordan v. Natrona Lumber Co., 52 Wyo. 393, 75 P.2d 378,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1938).

Lien against estate. —

Where one, after erecting buildings on land of another, dies and his administratrix purchases the land and takes a deed thereof in her own name, using estate funds for that purpose, and rebuilds building after its destruction by fire, using insurance money belonging to the estate, a person who, without notice of rights of the estate, supplies labor and materials for the building, and files mechanic's lien therefor, acquires a lien on the building and land prior to rights of the heir. Seibel v. Bath, 5 Wyo. 409, 40 P. 756,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1895).

Owner of equitable title cannot burden legal title with liens.

Sargent v. Delgado, 492 P.2d 193,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1972).

Thus contract made by vendee for labor and materials will not subject legal owner's interest to a lien,

even if the latter has knowledge that the labor and materials are being furnished. Sargent v. Delgado, 492 P.2d 193,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1972).

Cited

in

Phelan v. Cheyenne Brick Co., 26 Wyo. 493, 188 P. 354,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1920); Tottenhoff v. Rocky Mt. Constr. Co., 609 P.2d 464,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Enforceability of single mechanic's lien upon several parcels against less than the entire property liened, 68 ALR3d 1300.

§ 29-2-103.
Right of judicial sale and removal of improvements.

Any lien claimant enforcing the lien may have the building, improvements and real property sold under execution. However, if any party establishes that the real property, after removal of the improvement, would be in the same or similar condition as prior to the performance of the work for which the lien is claimed, the court may authorize the removal of the improvement. In addition to attorneys’ fees and costs, the lien claimant foreclosing the lien may be entitled to reasonable costs for removing any improvement or for restoring the property to its original condition.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 77, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1519; R.S. 1899, § 2891; C.S. 1910, § 3801; C.S. 1920, § 4864; R.S. 1931, § 66-506; C.S. 1945, § 55-203; W.S. 1957, § 29-6; W.S. 1977, §

29-2-104

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2010, ch. 92, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to priority of lien, see §

29-1-305

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “lien claimant” for “person” near the beginning; deleting “provided by this chapter” following “enforcing the lien”; inserted “and real property”; substituted “real property” for “land”; inserted “In addition to attorneys' fees and costs” in the second sentence; and substituted “lien claimant” for “party.”

Lien of chattel mortgage

on a mining claim, machinery and equipment is superior to a miner's lien for work which was performed after the filing of the mortgage. Prugh v. Imhoff, 44 Wyo. 143, 9 P.2d 152,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1932).

Conveyance before judgment, but subsequent to lien. —

A sale under judgment in action to enforce mechanic's lien takes priority over conveyance made by owner of property before rendition of judgment but subsequent to attaching of the lien, although the judgment does not describe the property. Lee v. Cook, 2 Wyo. 312,

1880 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1880).

Sale of structure. —

Under this section judgment ordering sale under execution of a structure to which a lien for materials attaches is valid and enforceable, though structure cannot be removed from the land, as the purchaser is authorized to do within a reasonable time, since he may agree with owner to leave property on the land. Clarke v. Shoshoni Lumber Co., 31 Wyo. 205, 224 P. 845,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1924), writ of error dismissed, 276 U.S. 595, 48 S. Ct. 302, 72 L. Ed. 722, 1928 U.S. LEXIS 118 (U.S. 1928).

Mechanic's lien against house built upon mortgaged land. —

If a contractor, under contract with the owner of the equity of redemption on mortgaged land, builds a new house upon the land, he has a mechanic's lien against the house, and the house may be sold and removed by the purchaser; for this preserves to the mortgagee all the security he formerly had and secures, as far as possible, the payment to the contractor for the work and materials he used in building the house. Sargent v. Delgado, 492 P.2d 193,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1972).

Superintendent's lien for services. —

Superintendent and engineer in charge of construction of plant who also performed work and labor was entitled to lien for his salary. Continental & Commercial Trust & Sav. Bank v. North Platte Valley Irr. Co., 219 F. 438, 1915 U.S. App. LEXIS 1639 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1915).

Timely filing. —

Where last materials for job were delivered June 15, 1912, though not actually used and accounts were kept open continuously until that date, lien statement was properly filed within 90 days from that time. Continental & Commercial Trust & Sav. Bank v. North Platte Valley Irr. Co., 219 F. 438, 1915 U.S. App. LEXIS 1639 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1915).

Cited

in

Tottenhoff v. Rocky Mt. Constr. Co., 609 P.2d 464,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1980).

Law reviews. —

See note “Priority Between Mortgages and Mechanics' Liens,” 13 Wyo. L.J. 239 (1959).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Priority as between artisans' lien and chattel mortgage, 36 ALR2d 229.

Priority as between purchase-money mortgage and mechanic's lien, 73 ALR2d 1407.

Advances made under previously executed mortgage, 80 ALR2d 179.

Priorities as between previously perfected security interest and repairman's lien on motor vehicle under Uniform Commercial Code, 69 ALR3d 1162.

§ 29-2-104.
Lien upon leaseholds; foreclosure; removal of improvements.

Every building or improvement or any material furnished for use upon any leased property shall subject the leasehold interest to the lien provided by this chapter.

A lien claimant may:

Proceed to foreclose a lien upon the leasehold subject to the limitations of W.S. 29-2-101(a), (b) and (c); or

Seek an order from the court for removal of any improvement. Upon establishing that the property will be in the same or similar condition as prior to the performance of the work for which the lien is claimed, the court may authorize the removal. The party foreclosing the lien may be entitled to reasonable costs for removing any improvements or for restoring the property to its previous condition.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 78, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 1520; R.S. 1899, § 2892; C.S. 1910, § 3802; C.S. 1920, § 4865; R.S. 1931, § 66-507; C.S. 1945, § 55-204; W.S. 1957, § 29-9; W.S. 1977, §

29-2-107

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

Cited

in

Tottenhoff v. Rocky Mt. Constr. Co., 609 P.2d 464,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Enforceability of mechanic's lien attached to leasehold estate against landlord's fee, 74 ALR3d 330.

§ 29-2-105.
Lien for improvements placed by tenant authorized by landlord.

Notwithstanding the definition of “owner”, if a tenant places any improvements either within or on the outside of any building or on the real property on which the building stands, the person doing any work or furnishing any material for the purpose of the improvement shall have a lien upon the landlord’s and the tenant’s interest in the building and real property as provided by this chapter if:

The landlord has agreed to pay the costs of the improvement; or

The improvements are specifically authorized by the landlord.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 81, § 22; R.S. 1887, § 1538; R.S. 1899, § 2909; C.S. 1910, § 3819; C.S. 1920, § 4883; R.S. 1931, § 66-525; C.S. 1945, § 55-223; W.S. 1957, § 29-10; W.S. 1977, §

29-2-108

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2010, ch. 92, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “real property” for “land” twice; and inserted “landlord's and the tenant's interest in the.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Agency of lessee. —

Under lease whereby the lessor obligates lessee as part of consideration to make permanent and substantial improvements on a building, to make it usable, and lessee fails to pay materialmen for materials furnished, latter may claim lien upon the leased premises, lessee under such a lease being presumed to be agent of the lessor. Jordan v. Natrona Lumber Co., 52 Wyo. 393, 75 P.2d 378,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1938).

Construction. —

Term “specifically authorized,” as used in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 29-2-105(a)(ii), requires a showing of an agency relationship between a landlord and tenant before a mechanic's lien may attach to the landlord's property.
Redco Constr. v. Profile Props., LLC, 2012 WY 24, 271 P.3d 408,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2012).

Agency relationship required. —

Summary judgment was properly awarded to a landlord in a contractor's action to foreclose a mechanic's lien because the trial court correctly interpreted Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 29-2-105(a)(ii) to require a finding of agency between the landlord and a tenant before a mechanic's lien could attach to the landlord's property for work performed at the tenant's behest.
Redco Constr. v. Profile Props., LLC, 2012 WY 24, 271 P.3d 408,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2012).

Cited

in

Tottenhoff v. Rocky Mt. Constr. Co., 609 P.2d 464,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to mechanic's lien against fixtures installed upon property under lease, 42 ALR2d 685.